Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
348

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION

Section

348-1 State vocational rehabilitation; policy
and

scope

348-2 Definitions

348-3 Functions of the department

348-4 Repealed

348-5 Federal employees

348-6 Administrative personnel and
administration

348-7 Cooperative arrangements, etc.

348-8 State rehabilitation council

348-9 Repealed

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next